Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.076

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this chapter and chapter 18.53 RCW.

[ 1987 c 150 s 37; 1986 c 259 s 79.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.